GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST2/src/lex-func.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8	[€äàáâ]
!# CONTENT:     function words 
!# 		(pronouns, determiners, prepositiosn, conjunctions)
!#
!# LANGUAGE:    PORTUGUESE
!#
!# CREATED:	12-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# NOTE: 
!# - added features "+Neg" and "+Coord" to some conjunctions
!# ============================================================================

Multichar_Symbols
+Adv
+Art
+Conj
+Det
+Prep
+Pron


+Comp
+Coord 
+Def 
+Dem
+Excl
+Indef
+Interrog
+Neg
+Pers
+Pop
+Poss
+Postprep
+Refl
+Rel 

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF
+1P +2P +3P
+Nom +Acc +Dat +AccDat

+Acron +Abbr


! special markers
^=	! "compound" boundary

(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space

^]	! lemma boundary (for inflecting proper names)



!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;


!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON PrepA
a+Prep						#;
a+Prep^=o+Art+Def:à				FSG;
a+Prep^=o+Art+Def:ao				MSG;
a+Prep^=o+Art+Def:aos				MPL;
a+Prep^=o+Art+Def:às				FPL;

a+Prep^=aquele+Pron+Dem:àquela			FSG;
a+Prep^=aquele+Pron+Dem:àquelas			FPL;
a+Prep^=aquele+Pron+Dem:àquele			MSG;
a+Prep^=aquele+Pron+Dem:àqueles			MPL;
a+Prep^=aqueloutro+Pron+Dem:àqueloutra		FSG;
a+Prep^=aqueloutro+Pron+Dem:àqueloutras		FPL;
a+Prep^=aqueloutro+Pron+Dem:àqueloutro		MSG;
a+Prep^=aqueloutro+Pron+Dem:àqueloutros		MPL;
a+Prep^=aquilo+Pron+Dem:àquilo			MSP;
a+Prep^=onde+Pron+Rel:aonde			XSP;
a+Prep^=o% qual+Pron+Rel:ao% qual		MSG;
a+Prep^=o% qual+Pron+Rel:aos% quais		MPL;
a+Prep^=o% qual+Pron+Rel:à% qual		FSG;
a+Prep^=o% qual+Pron+Rel:às% quais		FPL;
a+Prep^=o% que+Pron+Indef:ao% que		XSG;


LEXICON PrepCOM
com+Prep					#;

com+Prep^=eu+Pron+Pers+1P+Sg:comigo		#;
com+Prep^=tu+Pron+Pers+2P+Sg:contigo		#;
com+Prep^=nós+Pron+Pers+1P+Pl:connosco		#;
com+Prep^=nós+Pron+Pers+1P+Pl:conosco		#;
com+Prep^=vós+Pron+Pers+2P+Pl:convosco		#;
com+Prep^=se+Refl+Pers+3P:consigo		#;

LEXICON ContPron3
^=ela+Pron+Acc+3P+Fem+Sg:a		#;
^=elas+Pron+Acc+3P+Fem+Pl:as		#;
^=ele+Pron+Acc+3P+Masc+Sg:o		#;
^=eles+Pron+Acc+3P+Masc+Pl:os		#;

LEXICON ROOT
um+Art+Indef			MSG;
um+Art+Indef:uma		FSG;
um+Art+Indef:umas		FPL;
um+Art+Indef:uns		MPL;
cada+Det+Indef			XSG;
cujo+Det+Rel:cuja		FSG;
cujo+Det+Rel:cujas		FPL;
cujo+Det+Rel:cujos		MPL;
cujo+Det+Rel			MSG;
outro+Det+Indef			MSG;
outro+Det+Indef:outra		FSG;
outro+Det+Indef:outras		FPL;
outro+Det+Indef:outros		MPL;
qual+Det+Interrog:quais		XPL;
qual+Det+Interrog		XSG;
qualquer+Det+Indef:quaisquer	XPL;
qualquer+Det+Indef		XSG;
quanto+Det+Interrog		MSG;
quanto+Det+Interrog:quanta	FSG;
quanto+Det+Interrog:quantas	FPL;
quanto+Det+Interrog:quantos	MPL;
que% de+Det+Excl		XPL;
que+Det+Interrog		XSP;
eu+Pron+Pers+Dat+1P+Sg:m		ContPron3;
tu+Pron+Pers+Dat+2P+Sg:t		ContPron3;
ele+Pron+Pers+Dat+3P+Masc+Sg:lh		ContPron3;
ela+Pron+Pers+Dat+3P+Fem+Sg:lh		ContPron3;
nós+Pron+Pers+Dat+1P+Pl:no-l		ContPron3;
vós+Pron+Pers+Dat+2P+Pl:vo-l		ContPron3;
eles+Pron+Pers+Dat+3P+Masc+Pl:lh	ContPron3;
elas+Pron+Pers+Dat+3P+Fem+Pl:lh		ContPron3;
se+Pron+Refl+AccDat+3P			XSP;
se+Pron+Refl+Postprep+3P:si		XSP;
meu+Pron+Poss			MSG;
meu+Pron+Poss:meus		MPL;
meu+Pron+Poss:minha		FSG;
meu+Pron+Poss:minhas		FPL;
teu+Pron+Poss			MSG;
teu+Pron+Poss:teus		MPL;
teu+Pron+Poss:tua		FSG;
teu+Pron+Poss:tuas		FPL;
seu+Pron+Poss			MSG;
seu+Pron+Poss:seus		MPL;
seu+Pron+Poss:sua		FSG;
seu+Pron+Poss:suas		FPL;
nosso+Pron+Poss			MSG;
nosso+Pron+Poss:nossos		MPL;
nosso+Pron+Poss:nossa		FSG;
nosso+Pron+Poss:nossas		FPL;
vosso+Pron+Poss			MSG;
vosso+Pron+Poss:vossos		MPL;
vosso+Pron+Poss:vossa		FSG;
vosso+Pron+Poss:vossas		FPL;
algo+Pron+Indef			MSG;
alguém+Pron+Indef		MSG;
alguma% coisa+Pron+Indef	FSG;
algum+Pron+Indef:alguma		FSG;
algum+Pron+Indef:algumas	FPL;
algum+Pron+Indef:alguns		MPL;
algum+Pron+Indef		MSG;
algures+Pron+Indef		MSG;
ambos+Pron+Indef:ambas		FPL;
ambos+Pron+Indef		MPL;
cada+Pron+Indef			XSG;
cada% um+Pron+Indef:cada% uma	FSG;
cada% um+Pron+Indef		MSG;
certo+Pron+Indef:certa	  	FSG;
certo+Pron+Indef:certas		FPL;
certo+Pron+Indef:certos		MPL;
certo+Pron+Indef		MSG;
coisíssima% nenhuma+Pron+Indef	FSG;
muito+Pron+Indef		MSG;
muito+Pron+Indef:muita		FSG;
muito+Pron+Indef:muitas		FPL;
muito+Pron+Indef:muitos		MPL;
nada+Pron+Indef			MSG;
nenhum+Pron+Indef		MSG;
nenhum+Pron+Indef:nenhuma	FSG;
nenhum+Pron+Indef:nenhumas	FPL;
nenhum+Pron+Indef:nenhuns	MPL;
ninguém+Pron+Indef		MSG;
o% que+Pron+Indef		XSG;
outrem+Pron+Indef		MSG;
outro+Pron+Indef		MSG;
outro+Pron+Indef:outra		FSG;
outro+Pron+Indef:outras		FPL;
outro+Pron+Indef:outros		MPL;
porquê+Pron+Indef		XSG;
pouco+Pron+Indef		MSG;
pouco+Pron+Indef:pouca		FSG;
pouco+Pron+Indef:poucas		FPL;
pouco+Pron+Indef:poucos		MPL;
qualquer+Pron+Indef:quaisquer	XPL;
qualquer+Pron+Indef		XSG;
qualquer% um+Pron+Indef		MSG;
qualquer% um+Pron+Indef:quaisquer% umas	FPL;
qualquer% um+Pron+Indef:quaisquer% uns	MPL;
qualquer% um+Pron+Indef:qualquer% uma	FSG;
quanto+Pron+Indef		MSG;
quanto+Pron+Indef:quanta	FSG;
quanto+Pron+Indef:quantas	FPL;
quanto+Pron+Indef:quantos	MPL;
quejando+Pron+Indef:quejandos	MPL;
tanto+Pron+Indef		MSG;
tanto+Pron+Indef:tanta		FSG;
tanto+Pron+Indef:tantas		FPL;
tanto+Pron+Indef:tantos		MPL;
toda% a% gente+Pron+Indef	FSG;
todo+Pron+Indef			MSG;
todo+Pron+Indef:toda		FSG;
todo+Pron+Indef:todas		FPL;
todo+Pron+Indef:todos		MPL;
tudo+Pron+Indef			MSG;
um+Pron+Indef:uma		FSG;
um+Pron+Indef:umas		FPL;
um+Pron+Indef:uns		MPL;
vários+Pron+Indef		MPL;
vários+Pron+Indef:várias	FPL;
aquele+Pron+Dem:aquela		FSG;
aquele+Pron+Dem:aquelas		FPL;
aquele+Pron+Dem:aqueles		MPL;
aquele+Pron+Dem			MSG;
aqueloutro+Pron+Dem:aqueloutra	FSG;
aqueloutro+Pron+Dem:aqueloutras	FPL;
aqueloutro+Pron+Dem:aqueloutros	MPL;
aquilo+Pron+Dem			MSG;
esse+Pron+Dem:essa		FSG;
esse+Pron+Dem:essas		FPL;
esse+Pron+Dem:esses		MPL;
essoutro+Pron+Dem:essoutra	FSG;
essoutro+Pron+Dem:essoutras	FPL;
essoutro+Pron+Dem:essoutros	MPL;
essoutro+Pron+Dem		MSG;
este+Pron+Dem:esta		FSG;
este+Pron+Dem:estas		FPL;
este+Pron+Dem:estes		MPL;
estoutro+Pron+Dem:estoutra	FSG;
estoutro+Pron+Dem:estoutras	FPL;
estoutro+Pron+Dem:estoutros	MPL;
estoutro+Pron+Dem		MSG;
isto+Pron+Dem			MSG;
como+Pron+Rel				XSP;
onde+Pron+Rel				XSP;
o% qual+Pron+Rel:as% quais		FPL;
o% qual+Pron+Rel:os% quais		MPL;
por+Prep^=o% qual+Pron+Rel:pela% qual	FSG;
por+Prep^=o% qual+Pron+Rel:pelas% quais	FPL;
por+Prep^=o% qual+Pron+Rel:pelo% qual	MSG;
por+Prep^=o% qual+Pron+Rel:pelos% quais	MPL;
quando+Pron+Rel			  	XSP;
quanto+Pron+Rel:quantas			FPL;
quanto+Pron+Rel:quantos			MPL;
quem+Pron+Rel				XSP;
que+Pron+Rel				XSP;
como+Pron+Interrog			XSG;
o% que+Pron+Interrog			MSG;
qual+Pron+Interrog:quais		XPL;
qual+Pron+Interrog			XSG;
quanto+Pron+Interrog			MSG;
quanto+Pron+Interrog:quanta		FSG;
quanto+Pron+Interrog:quantas		FPL;
quanto+Pron+Interrog:quantos		MPL;
quem+Pron+Interrog			XSG;
que+Pron+Interrog			XSG;
quê+Pron+Interrog			XSG;
como% tal+Pron				XSG;	!E
como% tal+Pron:como% tais		XPL;	!E
as% senhoras+Pron		FPL;
os% senhores+Pron		MPL;
você+Pron			XSG;
você+Pron+Nom+3P+Pop:ocê	XSG;	!??
vocês+Pron			XPL;
vosmecê+Pron+Nom+3P		XSG;
vossemecê+Pron+Nom+3P		XSG;
Vossa% Excelência+Pron		FSG;
Vossa% Senhoria+Pron		FSG;
a% gente+Pron+Nom+3P		XSG;
					PrepA;		! preposition "a" without any prefix
até% 					PrepA;
					PrepCOM;	! preposition "com" (incl. with personal pronouns)
de% acordo% 				PrepCOM;
defronte% 				PrepA;
devido% 				PrepA;
em% atenção% 				PrepA;
em% face% 				PrepA;
em% frente% 				PrepA;
em% torno% 				PrepA;
face% 					PrepA;
frente% 				PrepA;
graças% 				PrepA;
junto% 					PrepCOM;	!??
junto% 					PrepA;
para% 					PrepCOM;
por+Prep^=o+Art+Def:pelas		FPL;
por+Prep^=o+Art+Def:pelo		MSG;
por+Prep^=o+Art+Def:pelos		MPL;
pra+Prep^=o+Art+Def:pra			FSG;
LEXICON PrepDE
de+Prep^=o+Art+Def:do		MSG;
de+Prep^=o+Art+Def:dos		MPL;
de+Prep^=um+Art+Indef:duma	FSG;
de+Prep^=um+Art+Indef:dumas	FPL;
de+Prep^=algum+Pron+Indef:dalgum		MSG;
de+Prep^=algum+Pron+Indef:dalguns		MPL;
de+Prep^=o% que+Pron+Indef:do% que		XSG;
de+Prep^=outro+Pron+Indef:doutra		FSG;
de+Prep^=outro+Pron+Indef:doutras		FPL;
de+Prep^=um+Pron+Indef:dum			MSG;
de+Prep^=um+Pron+Indef:duns			MPL;
de+Prep^=aquele+Pron+Dem:daquela		FSG;
de+Prep^=aquele+Pron+Dem:daquelas		FPL;
de+Prep^=aqueloutro+Pron+Dem:daqueloutro	MSG;
de+Prep^=aqueloutro+Pron+Dem:daqueloutros	MPL;
de+Prep^=aquilo+Pron+Dem:daquilo		MSP;
de+Prep^=esse+Pron+Dem:dessa			FSG;
de+Prep^=esse+Pron+Dem:dessas			FPL;
de+Prep^=essoutro+Pron+Dem:dessoutro		MSG;
de+Prep^=essoutro+Pron+Dem:dessoutros		MPL;
de+Prep^=este+Pron+Dem:desta			FSG;
de+Prep^=este+Pron+Dem:destas			FPL;
de+Prep^=estoutro+Pron+Dem:destoutro		MSG;
de+Prep^=estoutro+Pron+Dem:destoutros		MPL;
de+Prep^=isso+Pron+Dem:disso			MSP;
de+Prep^=isto+Pron+Dem:disto			MSP;
de+Prep^=ela+Pron+Pers+3P:dela			FSG;	! with personal pronoun
de+Prep^=elas+Pron+Pers+3P:delas		FPL;
de+Prep^=onde+Pron+Rel:donde			XSP;	! with realtibe pronoun
de+Prep^=o% qual+Pron+Rel:do% qual		MSG;
de+Prep^=o% qual+Pron+Rel:dos% quais		MPL;
LEXICON PrepEM
em+Prep^=o+Art+Def:na				FSG;
em+Prep^=o+Art+Def:nas				FPL;
em+Prep^=um+Art+Indef:num			MSG;
em+Prep^=um+Art+Indef:nuns			MPL;
em+Prep^=algum+Pron+Indef:nalguma		FSG;
em+Prep^=algum+Pron+Indef:nalgumas		FPL;
em+Prep^=aquele+Pron+Dem:naquele		MSG;
em+Prep^=aquele+Pron+Dem:naqueles		MPL;
em+Prep^=aqueloutro+Pron+Dem:naqueloutra	FSG;
em+Prep^=aqueloutro+Pron+Dem:naqueloutras	FPL;
em+Prep^=aquilo+Pron+Dem:naquilo		MSP;
em+Prep^=ele+Pron+Pers+3P:nele			MSG;		
em+Prep^=eles+Pron+Pers+3P:neles		MPL;
em+Prep^=esse+Pron+Dem:nessa			FSG;
em+Prep^=esse+Pron+Dem:nessas			FPL;
em+Prep^=essoutro+Pron+Dem:nessoutro		MSG;
em+Prep^=essoutro+Pron+Dem:nessoutros		MPL;
em+Prep^=este+Pron+Dem:nesta			FSG;
em+Prep^=este+Pron+Dem:nestas			FPL;
em+Prep^=estoutro+Pron+Dem:nestoutro		MSG;
em+Prep^=estoutro+Pron+Dem:nestoutros		MPL;
em+Prep^=isso+Pron+Dem:nisso			MSP;
em+Prep^=isto+Pron+Dem:nisto			MSP;
em+Prep^=o% qual+Pron+Rel:na% qual		FSG;
em+Prep^=o% qual+Pron+Rel:nas% quais		FPL;
em+Prep^=o% que+Pron+Indef:no% que		XSG;
em+Prep^=outro+Pron+Indef:noutro		MSG;
em+Prep^=outro+Pron+Indef:noutros		MPL;
em+Prep^=um+Pron+Indef:numa			FSG;
em+Prep^=um+Pron+Indef:numas			FPL;
